Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.216 and 2019 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A child of a military family complies with the residency requirements for enrollment in a school district if a parent of the child is transferred to, or is pending transfer to, a military installation within the state ((while on active duty))or bordering state, or the military family is transferring due to a military exigency requiring relocation, pursuant to official military orders.(b) A parent of the child must provide proof of official military orders or documentation by their military commander of the directed move.(c) A parent of the child must provide to the school district proof of residence in the school district within ((fourteen))90 calendar days of ((the arrival date provided on official military documentation))enrollment. The parent may use the address of any of the following as proof of residence in the school district:(i) A temporary ((on-base billeting facility))lodging within the school district where the military family is expecting to obtain permanent housing;(ii) A purchased or leased residence, or a signed purchase and sale agreement or lease agreement for a residence; or(iii) Any federal government housing or off-base military housing, including off-base military housing that may be provided through a public-private venture.(2) A school district shall accept, on a conditional basis, an application for enrollment and course registration, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, prior to the military family arriving in the state, by electronic or other means for children of military families who meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section. Upon satisfaction of the requirements of subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section, the school district shall finalize the enrollment of children of military families.(3) If the enrolling child of a military family is transferring with an individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the rehabilitation act of 1973, the school district shall take the necessary steps to accept the transfer of records and any prior evaluations. Upon enrollment, the school district shall ensure that the child of a military family receives the appropriate services and accommodations, consistent with the child of a military family's existing individualized education program or section 504 plan without unreasonable delay. If a reevaluation is deemed necessary, the reevaluation must occur within 30 calendar days after the date of arrival, subject to the informed parental consent of the parent.(4) Nonresident school districts are not required to provide transportation to and from the school unless otherwise required by state or federal law.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Active duty" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(b) "Child of a military family" and "children of military families" have the same meaning as "children of military families" in RCW 28A.705.010.(c) "Military installation" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(d) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of a child of a military family.--- END ---